Massachusetts, session 194th, H122.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 129 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
following section:- 
Section 49. (a) For the purposes of this section the following words shall, unless the 
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings: 
“Pet”, any domestic animal that has been adapted or tamed to live in intimate association 
with people but, not limited to, dogs, cats, rodents, fish, birds, snakes, turtles, lizards, frogs and 
rabbits. 
“Pet cemetery”, any plot of ground used or intended to be used, for the permanent burial 
or disposition of the remains of a pet in a grave, a mausoleum, a columbarium, a vault or other 

of 2 10 receptacle provided by any person for a fee, whether or not for profit, to veterinarians or 
members of the general public. 
(b) The owner of any real property used or to be used for a pet cemetery shall file in the 
registry of deeds in which the real property is located, a dedication restricting the real property to 
be used only for such purposes as are usual and customary for the operation of a pet cemetery. 
(c) The owner or operator of every pet cemetery shall keep adequate records of all 
purchasers of space for pet remains within the grounds of such pet cemetery. 
(d) The director shall promulgate rules or regulations necessary to carry out this 
section. 
SECTION 2. This act shall apply to any real property used as a pet cemetery, as defined 
in section 1, before, on or after the effective date of this act.